Utah statutes.
78B-15-404.   Required form.

(1)  The Office of Vital Records shall prepare a form to be filed with the agency.  The form shall require the signature of the registrant and state that the form is signed under penalty of perjury.

(2)  The form shall also state that:

(a)  a timely filing of notice of the initiation of paternity proceedings which is filed pursuant to Subsection 78B-15-402(1) entitles the registrant to notice of a proceeding for adoption of the child;

(b)  a timely filing does not commence a proceeding to establish paternity;

(c)  the information disclosed on the form may be used against the registrant to establish paternity;

(d)  services to assist in establishing paternity of a child who is not placed for adoption are available to the registrant through the Office of Recovery Services;

(e)  the registrant should also file in another state if conception or birth of the child occurred in the other state;

(f)  information on registries of other states is available from the Office of Vital Records; and

(g)  procedures exist to remove the filing of a proceeding to establish paternity if the proceeding is dismissed, or if a finding of paternity is rescinded or set aside under this chapter.

